test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_caallid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    kästiđ+V+Inf: kästiđ
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: káástám
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: káástáh
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kástá
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kästeen
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kästivettee
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kästiv
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kästip
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kästivetteđ
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kästih
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kastim
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kastih
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaastij
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kastijm
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kastijd
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kastijn
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kaastijm
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kaastijd
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kastii
    kästiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kástáččim
    kästiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kástáččih
    kästiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kástáččij
    kästiđ+V+Cond+Du1: kástáččáim
    kästiđ+V+Cond+Du2: kástáččáid
    kästiđ+V+Cond+Du3: kástáččáin
    kästiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kástáččijm
    kästiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kástáččijd
    kästiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kástáččii
    kästiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kastižeem
    kästiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kastižeeh
    kästiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: kaastiš
    kästiđ+V+Pot+Du1: kastižeen
    kästiđ+V+Pot+Du2: kaastišvettee
    kästiđ+V+Pot+Du3: kastižává
    kästiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kastižep
    kästiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: kaastišvetteđ
    kästiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kastižeh
    kästiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: kastum
    kästiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: käästi
    kästiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: káástus
    kästiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kástoon
    kästiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kästee
    kästiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kástus
    kästiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kästip
    kästiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kästiđ
    kästiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kástus
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: käästi
    kästiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kástám
    kästiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: kástáččii
    kästiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: kaastiš
    kästiđ+V+PrsPrc: kästee
    kästiđ+V+PrfPrc: kástám
    kästiđ+V+Actio: kästim
    kästiđ+V+Actio+Ess: kästimin
    kästiđ+V+Actio+Loc: kästimist
    kästiđ+V+Actio+Ill: kästimân
    kästiđ+V+Actio+Com: kästidijn
    kästiđ+V+VAbess: kästihánnáá
    kästiđ+V+VAbess: kästihinnáá
    kästiđ+V+VAbess: kästihánnáá
